apertium-cos.cos.dix
    <pardef n="d/uvè__vbmod">
      <e><p><l>uvè</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evè</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>óvu</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>óvi</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>óve</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uvèmu</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uvète</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>óvenu</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>evu</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evi</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>eve</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ivèmu</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ivète</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>evenu</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>uvia</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uvii</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uvia</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uviamu</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uviate</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uvianu</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>uverà</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>evia</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>uveria</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uveriamu</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evianu</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>uvut</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ivut</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ovut</l><r>uvè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="p/udè__vbmod">
      <e><p><l>udè</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ossu</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oi</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ò</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ode</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>udemu</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>udete</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onu</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oni</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>udia</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>udianu</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>uderà</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uderete</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uderanu</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>udessi</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>uderia</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ussut</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>udut</l><r>udè<s n="vbmod"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="s/apè__vblex">
      <e><p><l>apè</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ape</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__finisce/li"/></e>

      <e><p><l>ò</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>à</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>èmu</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>emu</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>apemu</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ète</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>apete</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>anu</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>apiamu</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>aperai</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aperà</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aperemu</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>appiut</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aput</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p><par n="S__stat/u"/></e>

      <e><p><l>apendu</l><r>apè<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <e lm="pudè"><i>p</i><par n="p/udè__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="duvè"><i>d</i><par n="d/uvè__vbmod"/></e>
    <e lm="sapè"><i>s</i><par n="s/apè__vblex"/></e>
